Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-325.01
Foreign corporation authority to transact business revoked; reinstatement;
procedure.

(1) A foreign corporation, the certificate of
authority of which has been administratively revoked
under section 21-325, may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement
within five years after the effective date of the revocation. The application
shall:

(a) Recite the name of the foreign corporation and the effective date
of the revocation;

(b) State that the ground or grounds for revocation either did not exist
or have been eliminated;

(c) State that the foreign corporation's name satisfies the requirements
of section 21-2,208; and

(d) Be accompanied by a fee in the amount prescribed in section 21-205, as such section may from time to time
be amended, for an application for reinstatement.

(2) If the Secretary of State determines (a) that the application contains
the information required by subsection (1) of this section and that the information
is correct and (b) that the foreign corporation has complied with subsection
(4) of this section, he or she shall cancel the certificate of revocation,
prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites his or her determination
and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate,
and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under section 21-2,212.

(3) When the reinstatement is effective, it shall relate back to and
take effect as of the effective date of the administrative revocation
and the foreign corporation shall resume carrying on its business as if the administrative revocation
had never occurred.

(4) A foreign corporation applying for reinstatement under this section
shall:

(a)(i) Pay to the Secretary of State a sum equal to all occupation taxes
delinquent as of the effective date of the revocation, plus a sum equal to
all occupation taxes which would otherwise have been due for the years the
foreign corporation's certificate of authority was revoked, and
(ii) deliver to the Secretary of
State a properly executed and signed biennial report for the most recent even-numbered
year; and

(b) Pay to the Secretary of State an additional amount derived by multiplying
the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time
be adjusted, times the amount of occupation taxes required to be paid by it
for each year that such foreign corporation's certificate of authority was
revoked.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 201;

Laws 1996, LB 1036, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 14;

Laws 2012, LB854, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 257.
January 1, 2017